California, session 20252026, AB2546.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 310 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:310. The director shall have the following powers and it shall be his the director’s duty to:(a) Recommend and propose the enactment of such legislation as that is necessary to protect and promote the interests of consumers.(b) Represent the consumer’s interests before federal and state legislative hearings and executive commissions.(c) Assist, advise, and cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies and officials to protect and promote the interests of consumers.(d) Study, investigate, research, and analyze matters affecting the interests of consumers.(e) Hold public hearings, subpoena witnesses, take testimony, compel the production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence, and call upon other state agencies for information.(f) Propose and assist in the creation and development of consumer education programs.(g) Promote ethical standards of conduct for business and consumers and undertake activities to encourage public responsibility in the production, promotion, sale sale, and lease of consumer goods and services.(h) Advise the Governor and the Legislature on all matters affecting the interests of consumers.(i) Exercise and perform such other functions, powers powers, and duties as may be that are deemed appropriate to protect and promote the interests of consumers as directed by the Governor or the Legislature.(j) Maintain contact and liaison with consumer groups in California and nationally.